District of Columbia statutes.
34-504

Issue of stocks for purpose of reorganization or consolidation; approval of consolidation by Commission.

No public utility shall issue any stocks, certificates of stock, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness secured on its property in the District of Columbia for the purpose of any reorganization or consolidation in excess of the total amount of the stocks, certificates of stock, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness then outstanding against the public utilities so reorganizing or consolidating, and no such public utility shall purchase the property of any other public utility for the purpose of effecting a consolidation until the Commission shall have determined and set forth in writing that said consolidation will be in the public interest, nor until the Commission shall have approved in writing the terms upon which said consolidation shall be made.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 76

Cross References

Sale and merger of utilities, generally, see § 34-1001.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-704.
1973 Ed., § 43-805.